Washington statutes.
RCW 43.270.080

Gifts, grants, and endowments.

The department of commerce may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of RCW 43.270.010 through 43.270.080 and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2077; 2001 c 48 s 4; 1989 c 271 s 322.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.